Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.19.050

Provisions of chapter additional to other requirements.

The requirements imposed by this chapter are to be in addition to, and not in lieu of, requirements imposed on a transaction by any provision in the articles of incorporation or the bylaws of the target corporation, or otherwise.

[ 1989 c 165 s 201.]